District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.57

Council action.

Upon receiving the draft act and report from the Commission as required by § 1-611.54, the Chairman shall introduce the proposed legislation at the next legislative session. The Council shall hold a public hearing on the legislation within 6 months of its introduction.

Mar 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1157
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1092
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.